Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-265
Game and Parks Commission; convey described property.

The Game and Parks Commission is authorized and directed to convey to the county of Buffalo for public park purposes, subject to the conditions described in section 90-266, the following described real estate now known as Ravenna State Recreation Area, situated in Buffalo County, Nebraska, to wit:

(1) A tract of land in the southwest quarter of section 10 and the east part of the southeast quarter of section 9, township 12 north, range 14 west of the sixth principal meridian, situated in Buffalo County, Nebraska, described as follows: Beginning at a point 200 feet east of the southwest corner of the southwest quarter of section 10, township 12 north range 14 west of sixth principal meridian; thence north for a distance of 900 feet; thence west for a distance of 200 feet; thence north to a point 450 feet south of northwest corner of the southwest quarter of said section 10; thence west for a distance of 385 feet; thence north for a distance of 50 feet; thence east for a distance of 385 feet to the northwest corner of the southwest quarter of said section 10; thence east for a distance of 700 feet; thence angle right 42 degrees, 30 minutes, for a distance of 236 feet; thence angle right 8 degrees, 0 minutes, for a distance of 284 feet; thence angle left 3 degrees, 2 minutes, for a distance of 138 feet; thence angle left 17 degrees, 9 minutes, for a distance of 197 feet; thence angle right 43 degrees, 34 minutes, for a distance of 383 feet; thence angle right 16 degrees, 51 minutes, for a distance of 216 feet; thence angle right 20 degrees, 47 minutes, for a distance of 21 feet; thence angle left 13 degrees, 53 minutes, for a distance of 272 feet, to the east line of the west half of the said southwest quarter of section 10; thence south one for a distance of 1,044 feet to the south line of said southwest quarter of section 10; thence west for a distance of 1,120 feet to the place of beginning and containing 78.03 acres, more or less;

(2) A tract of land beginning at the southeast corner of the west half of the southwest quarter of section 10, township 12 north, range 14 west of the sixth principal meridian, running due north for a distance of 1,044 feet; thence angle right 7 degrees, 38 minutes, for a distance of 272 feet; thence angle right 13 degrees, 53 minutes, for a distance of 214 feet; thence angle left 20 degrees, 47 minutes, for a distance of 216 feet; thence angle left 43 degrees, 34 minutes, for a distance of 182 feet; thence angle right 157 degrees, 21 minutes, for a distance of 137 feet; thence angle right 21 degrees, 53 minutes, for a distance of 100 feet; thence angle right 14 degrees, 17 minutes, for a distance of 95 feet; thence angle right 10 degrees, 7 minutes, for a distance of 164 feet; thence angle right 5 degrees, 43 minutes, for a distance of 100 feet; thence angle right 5 degrees, 30 minutes, for a distance of 195 feet; thence angle left 12 degrees, 26 minutes, for a distance of 72 feet; thence angle left 17 degrees, 1 minute, for a distance of 307 feet; thence angle right 11 degrees, 47 minutes, for a distance of 100 feet; thence angle right 2 degrees, 30 minutes, for a distance of 150 feet; thence angle right 1 degree, 19 minutes, for a distance of 160 feet; thence angle right 0 degrees, 44 minutes, for a distance of 220 feet; thence angle left 27 degrees, 52 minutes, for a distance of 111 feet, to the railroad right-of-way line; thence on the railroad right-of-way line angle right 62 degrees, 27 minutes, for a distance of 37.8 feet, to the intersection of the right-of-way line and the south line of section 10, township 12 north, range 14 west of the sixth principal meridian; thence a distance of 82.7 feet west along the south line of section 10, township 12 north, range 14 west of the sixth principal meridian, to the southeast corner of the west half of the southwest quarter of section 10, township 12 north, range 14 west of the sixth principal meridian, which is the point of beginning, containing 2.63 acres, more or less; and

(3) A strip of land 100 feet in width situated in the southeast quarter of the northeast quarter of section 16, township 12 north, range 14 west of the sixth principal meridian, extending southwesterly from the east line of said section 16 to the northeasterly boundary line of Nebraska State Highway 2, said strip being 50 feet in width, measured at right angles on each side of the following described center line of former main track of the Pleasanton branch of Union Pacific Railroad Company as formerly constructed and operated: Beginning at a point on the east line of said section 16 that is a distance of 1,550 feet south of the northeast corner of said section 16; thence southwesterly along a straight line forming an angle of 46 degrees, 15 minutes, from south to southwest with the east line of said section 16 for a distance of 1,130 feet, more or less, to a point in said northeasterly boundary line of existing Nebraska State Highway 2, containing an area of 2.59 acres, more or less, in Buffalo County, Nebraska.

Laws 1996, LB 1070, § 1.